Maine, session 132, LD1752.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 36 MRSA §1760, sub-§116 is enacted to read:
116. Machinery and equipment used to provide broadband communications
service. Beginning January 1, 2026, sales of machinery and equipment used to provide
broadband communications service to a broadband communications service provider. As
used in this subsection:
A. "Broadband communications service" means Internet access service,
telecommunications services under section 2551, subsection 20-A or video
programming service;
B. "Broadband communications service provider" or "provider" means a person that is
engaged principally in the business of providing broadband communications service
and includes an affiliated person of that person as described in section 1752, subsection
6-F;
C. "Machinery and equipment used to provide broadband communications service"
means equipment and materials used by a broadband communications service provider
to transmit broadband communications service from the provider to a customer,
including, but not limited to, equipment and materials used to monitor, test and
maintain qualifying equipment, and machinery, ancillary components, appurtenances,
accessories or other infrastructure that is similar in type and function and used in whole
or in part to provide broadband communications service; and
D. "Video programming service" means video programming and associated audio
signals used to provide consumer entertainment and information service by means of
broadcast cable television or direct-to-home satellite delivery, Internet or other forms
of mass communication.